Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB245.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 8 TLSB 2671YC (2) 91 da/ns H.F. _____ Section 1. Section 169.3, Code 2025, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 9A. âPeace officerâ means the same as 3 defined in section 801.4. 4 Sec. 2. Section 169.13, Code 2025, is amended by adding the 5 following new subsection: 6 NEW SUBSECTION . 1A. A licensed veterinarian immune 7 from administrative, civil, or criminal liability under 8 section 169.18A is not subject to disciplinary action under 9 this chapter. Any information disclosed by a licensed 10 veterinarian acting under section 169.18A is not subject to a 11 confidentiality requirement that would otherwise be applicable 12 to the licensed veterinarian under this chapter. 13 Sec. 3. NEW SECTION . 169.18A Immunity ââ limitations ââ 14 administrative, civil, and criminal liability. 15 1. A licensed veterinarian, when acting in good faith and 16 in conformance within the minimal standard of acceptable and 17 prevailing practice of veterinary medicine as defined in rules 18 adopted by the board, is immune from administrative, civil, 19 or criminal liability which might otherwise be incurred or 20 imposed as a result of the licensed veterinarian doing any of 21 the following: 22 a. Cooperating with a peace officer in a matter relating 23 to the alleged conduct of a licensed veterinarianâs client 24 that, if true, would constitute an offense punishable as a 25 misdemeanor or felony under chapter 717B, 717C, or 717D. The 26 licensed veterinarian may provide such cooperation in any 27 manner that assists the peace officer, including but not 28 limited to making a report to a peace officer or providing the 29 peace officer with information regarding the alleged conduct. 30 b. Cooperating with a local authority or law enforcement 31 officer, as each is defined in section 717B.1, to rescue a 32 threatened animal as provided in section 717B.5. 33 c. Participating in a dispositional proceeding or complying 34 with a court order arising from the dispositional proceeding 35 -1- LSB 2671YC (2) 91 da/ns 1/ 4 H.F. _____ as provided in section 717B.4. 1 d. Providing competent and truthful evidence in an 2 administrative, civil, or criminal case relating to another 3 personâs conduct that, if true, would constitute an offense 4 punishable as a misdemeanor or felony under chapter 717B, 717C, 5 or 717D. The licensed veterinarian may provide answers in a 6 deposition or interrogatory, testimony, record as defined in 7 section 554.1201, or other physical evidence. 8 2. A licensed veterinarian who knowingly makes a false 9 report to a peace officer or knowingly provides the peace 10 officer with false information regarding a clientâs alleged 11 conduct as provided in subsection 1, paragraph âaâ , is not 12 acting in good faith, is subject to disciplinary action by the 13 board, is civilly liable for damages proximately caused by 14 making such report or providing such information to a peace 15 officer, and is guilty of a simple misdemeanor. 16 Sec. 4. Section 670.4, subsection 1, Code 2025, is amended 17 by adding the following new paragraph: 18 NEW PARAGRAPH . 0k. A claim based on an act by a licensed 19 veterinarian when assisting a municipality in rescuing a 20 threatened animal as provided in section 717B.5, if the 21 licensed veterinarian is immune from administrative, criminal, 22 or civil liability as provided in section 169.18A, subsection 23 1. 24